Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Energy Development and Demonstration Projects

152.750.
Policy of Commonwealth — Implementation. [Repealed.]

152.755.
Contracts for development or demonstration projects. [Repealed.]

152.757.
Funds for annual lease rental payments for projects. [Repealed.]

152.760.
Revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

152.762.
Bonds, how to be secured. [Repealed.]

152.765.
Deposit of proceeds from contracts. [Repealed.]

152.770.
Limitation of Commonwealth’s liability and claims. [Repealed.]

152.775.
Termination of Commonwealth participation — Repayment. [Repealed.]

152.780.
Administrative staff. [Repealed.]

152.785.
Energy development and demonstration trust fund — Indemnity account. [Repealed.]